guesser/guess_bezhta_misc.lexd
LEXICON AdpAffixes
<post>:>лабза # вместо, ради
<post>:>аъ # кроме
<post>:>дāла # из-за

LEXICON Conjunctions
амма	#	но
бета	#	и
ва	#	и
да	#	если
йа	#	или
йаги	#	или
йана # или
лъ	#	когда
нагагь	#	если
цал	#	до каких пор
цой	#	как
вагьалълъобза	#	поэтому

LEXICON ConjClitics
<add>:>на
<add>:>наь
<conj>:>ла
<if>:>со
<conj>:>гъас	#	такой, как
<conj>:>гъадāс	#	подобный
<conj>:>дола	#	как
<conj>:>долас	#	столько
<conj>:>лъийо	#	подобный
<conj>:>цой	#	как
<conj>:>дана	#	хоть
<conj>:>со	#	то
<conj>:>цал	#	до каких пор

LEXICON PartClitics
<part>:>зу
<part>:>жуь
<part>:>со
<part>:>чен
<part>:>аъ
<part>:>лā
<part>:>че
<part>:>эче
<part>:>д
<part>:>ди
<part>:>ле
<quot>:>лӏо
<emph>:>сāъ
<emph>:>āъ
<emph>:>йāъ

LEXICON Particles
лабза	#	ради
бетта	#	да
ха	#	конечно
ӣᴴ	#	да
баьгь	#	-ка
вере	#	ну
гьаᴴ #	а ну
гьаᴴкъкъа #	-ка
гьаᴴъаᴴ #	на
огъонт #	только бы
гаьъаь #	нет
аᴴъаᴴгь #	нет
эᴴъэᴴгь #	нет
суна	#	нисколько
гьāᴴ	#	что
чӏараб	#	неужели
эггу	#	разве
суди	#	либо, -то
лӏо	#	мол
эче	# -ка

LEXICON Quotative
<quot>:>лӏо	#	мол

LEXICON Interjections
вабабай	# ой-ой-ой
вададай	# ой-ой-ой
вагь	# эх
вай	# ах
вере
валалай
валалагь
йе
йē
гьаᴴ
гьеᴴгь
ле
огь
огьогьой
салам
амин
аман
